District of Columbia statutes.
47-818.01

Adoption of enumerated reports as comparison.

Pursuant to § 47-817, the Council of the District of Columbia (“Council”) adopts the following reports as the Council’s comparison of tax rates and burdens applicable to residential and nonresidential real property in the District of Columbia (“District”) with the rates on property in jurisdictions in the vicinity of the District and as the Council’s comparison of other major taxes:

(1)

“Tax Rates and Tax Burdens in the District of Columbia: A Nationwide Comparison” (Government of the District of Columbia, June 1997); and

(2)

“A Comparison of Tax Rates and Burdens in the Washington Metropolitan Area” (Government of the District of Columbia, June 1997).

Sept. 3, 1974, Pub. L. 93-407, title IV, § 415a
as added Oct. 1, 1987, D.C. Law 7-28, § 3, 34 DCR 5094
Sept. 29, 1988, D.C. Law 7-161, § 2(c), 35 DCR 5730
Oct. 19, 1989, D.C. Law 8-46, § 2(d), 36 DCR 5783
Sept. 27, 1990, D.C. Law 8-172, § 2(e), 37 DCR 4844
Mar. 7, 1992, D.C. Law 9-62, § 2(d), 38 DCR 7291
Oct. 7, 1992, D.C. Law 9-177, § 4, 39 DCR 5868
Jan. 26, 1994, D.C. Law 10-66, § 4, 40 DCR 7358
May 16, 1995, D.C. Law 10-255,§ 40, 41 DCR 5193
Mar. 5, 1996, D.C. Law 11-98, § 1302, 43 DCR 5
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-222, § 3, 44 DCR 108
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
June 10, 1998, D.C. Law 12-122, § 2(b), 45 DCR 2300
1981 Ed., § 47-818.1.